Washington statutes.
RCW 17.12.040

Designation of district.

If the board shall deem the interests of the county or of any particular section thereof will be benefited by the creation of such a district or districts, or the changing thereof, it shall make a record thereof upon the minutes of the board and shall designate such territory in each such district as "Pest District . . . . . . for . . . . . . County".

[ 1919 c 152 s 4; RRS s 2804.]